New Jersey, session 222, A1169.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The Attorney General shall establish a 90-day pilot program in the 10 municipalities with the highest violent crime rate, as set forth in the most recent Uniform Crime Report data. Pursuant to the pilot program, each participating local law enforcement agency shall receive a ballistics scanning device. The device shall be used by each participating law enforcement agency as part of the agencys evidentiary and firearm intelligence and investigatory processes. b.    No later than 30 days following completion of the pilot program, the chief law enforcement officer of each law enforcement agency shall submit a report to the Attorney General that provides a detailed summary of each incident in which the agency used the device and recommends whether the agency should continue to use the device. c.     No later than 60 days following receipt of the reports submitted pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the Attorney General shall issue a report to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), with a recommendation concerning whether the pilot program should be made permanent with an annual appropriation made to fund use of the devices in municipalities with the highest violent crime rates. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of second month next following the date of enactment.